Wabble
To Wábble. v.n. [A low, barbarous word.] To shake; to move from side to side.
If in your work you find it wabble; that is, that one side of the flat inclines to the right or left hand, with soft blows of an hammer set it to rights, and then screw it hard up. Moxon.

Wad
Wad. n.s. [weod hay, Saxon.]

 A bundle of straw thrust close together.

 Wadd, or black lead, is a mineral of great use and value. Woodward.

Wadding
Wádding. n.s. [from wad, vad, Islandick.] A kind of soft stuff loosely woven, with which the skirts of coats are stuffed out.

Waddle
To Wáddle. v.n. [wagghelen, Dutch, to waggle; whence, by a casual corruption, waddle.] To shake, in walking from side to side; to deviate in motion from a right line.
She could have run and waddled all about. Shakesp.
The strutting petticoat smooths and levels all distinctions; while I cannot but be troubled to see so many well-shaped, innocent virgins bloated up, and waddling up and down like big-bellied women. Spectator, № 127.
              The farmer's goose,Grown fat with corn and sitting still,Can scarce get o'er the barn-door sill,And hardly waddles forth to coolHer belly in the neighb'ring pool. Swift.
A dabchick waddles through the copse,On feet and wings, and flies, and wades, and hops. Pope.
Dulness, of business the directing soul,To human heads like biass to the bowl;Which, as more pond'rous, makes their aim more true,Obliquely waddling to the mark in view. Pope.

Wade
To Wade. v.n. [from vadum, Lat. pronounced wadum.]

 To walk through the waters; to pass water without swimming.
We'll wade to the market-place in Frenchmen's blood. Sha.
She waded through the dirt to pluck him off. Shakespeare.
                I am in bloodStept in so far, that, should I wade no more,Returning were as tedious as go o'er. Shakesp. Macbeth.
He staid seven days at the Crassus, until a bridge was made for the transporting of his army, for that the river was not to be waded over. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
        Then since fortune's favours fade;You that in her arms do sleep,Learn to swim, and not to wade,For the hearts of kings are deep. Wotton's Poems.
With head, hands, wings, or feet pursues his way,And swims, or sinks, or wades, or creeps, or flies. Milton.
It is hard to wade deep in baths where springs arise. Brown.
Fowls that frequent waters, and only wade, have as well long legs as long necks; and those that are made for swimming have feet like oars. More's Divine Dialogues.
Those birds only wade in the water, and do not swim. More.
As when a dabchick waddles through the copseOn feet and wings, he flies, and wades, and hops. Pope.
 To pass difficultly and laboriously.
They were not permitted to enter unto war, nor conclude any league of peace, nor to wade through any act of moment between them and foreign states, unless the oracle of God, or his prophets, were first consulted with. Hooker, b. iii.
I have waded through the whole cause, searching the truth by the causes of truth. Hooker.
The substance of those controversies whereunto we have begun to wade, be rather of outward things appertaining to the church, than of any thing wherein the being of the church consisteth. Hooker, b. iii.
Virtue gives herself light, through darkness for to wade. Fairy Queen, b. i.
I should chuse rather with spitting and scorn to be tumbled into the dust in blood, bearing witness to any known truth of our Lord; than, by a denial of those truths, through blood and perjury wade to a sceptre, and lord it in a throne. South.
'Tis not to my purpose to wade into those bottomless controversies, which, like a gulph, have swallowed up so much time of learned men. Decay of Piety.
              The dameNow try'd the stairs, and wading through the night,Search'd all the deep recess, and issu'd into light. Dryden.
The wrathful God then plunges from above,And where in thickest waves the sparkles drove,There lights, and wades through fumes, and gropes his way,Half-sing'd, half-stifl'd. Dryden.
Simonides, the more he contemplated the nature of the Diety, found that he waded but the more out of his depth, and that he lost himself in the thought. Addison.

Wafer
Wafer. n.s. [wafel, Dutch.]

 A thin cake.
WIfe, make us a dinner; spare flesh, neither corn;Make wafers and cakes, for our sheepe must be shorne. Tusser.
Poor Sancho they persuaded that he enjoyed a great dominion, and then gave him nothing to subsist upon but wafers and marmalade. Pope.
 The bread given in the eucharist by the Romanists.
That the same body of Christ should be in a thousand places at once; that the whole body should lie hid in a little thin wafer; yet so, that the members thereof should not one run into another, but continue distinct, and have an order agreeable to a man's body, it doth exceed reason. Hall.
 Paste made to close letters.

Waft (noun)
Waft. n.s. [from the verb.]

 A floating body.
From the bellowing east oft the whirlwind's wingSweeps up the burthen of whole wintry plains,In one wide waft. Thomson's Winter.
 Motion of a streamer. Used as a token or mean of information at sea.

Waft (verb active)
To Waft. v.a. [probably from wave.]

 To carry through the air, or on the water.
        A braver choice of dauntless spirits,Than now the English bottoms have waft o'er,Did never float upon the swelling tide. Shakespeare.
                      Our high admiralShall waft them over with our royal fleet. Shakespeare.
Whether cripples, who have lost their thighs, will not sink but float; their lungs being able to waft up their bodies, which are in others overpoised by the hinder legs, we have not made experiment. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
Nor dares his transport-vessel cross the waves,With such whose bones are not compos'd in graves:A hundred years they wander on the shore;At length, their penance done, are wafted o'er. Dryden.
Lend to this wretch your hand, and waft him o'erTo the sweet banks of yon forbidden shore. Dryden.
From hence might first spring that opinion of the vehicles of spirits; the vulgar conceiving that the breath was that wherein the soul was wafted and carried away. Ray.
They before wafted over their troops into Sicily in open vessels. Arbuthnot on Coins.
In vain you tell your parting lover,You wish fair winds may waft him over:Alas! what winds can happy prove,That bear me far from what I love? Prior.
Speed the soft intercourse from soul to soul,And waft a sigh from Indus to the pole. Pope.
 To beckon; to inform by a sign of any thing moving.

Waft (verb neuter)
To Waft. v.n. To float.
It wafted nearer yet, and then she knew,That what before she but surmis'd, was true. Dryden.
Those trumpets his triumphant entry tell,And now the shouts waft near the citadel. Dryden.

Waftage
Wáftage. n.s. [from waft.] Carriage by water or air. Not in use.
What ship of Epidamnum stays for me? —— A ship you sent me to, to hire waftage. Shakespeare.
                I stalk about her door,Like a strange soul upon the Stygian banks,Staying for waftage. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.

Wafter
Wáfter. n.s. [from waft.] A passage boat. Ainsworth.

Wafture
Wáfture. n.s. [from waft.] The act of waving. Not in use.
                    You answer'd not;But with an angry wafture of your handGave sign for me to leave you. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.

Wag (noun)
Wag. n.s. [wœʒan, Saxon, to cheat.] Any one ludicrously mischievous; a merry droll.
Cupid the wag, that lately conquer'd hadWise counsellors, stout captains puissant;And ty'd them fast to lead his triumphs bad,Glutted with them, now plays with meanest things. Sidney.
Was not my lord the verier wag o' th' two? Shakesp.
We wink at wags, when they offend,And spare the boy, in hopes the man may mend. Dryden.
A counsellor never pleaded without a piece of packthread in his hand, which he used to twist about a finger all the while he was speaking: the wags used to call it the thread of his discourse. Addison.

Wag (verb active)
To Wag. v.a. [waʒian, Saxon; waggen, Dutch.] To move lightly; to shake slightly.
I can counterfeit the deep tragedian;Tremble and start at wagging of a straw. Shakespeare.
You may as well forbid the mountain pinesTo wag their high tops, and to make a noise,When they are fretted with the gusts of heav'n. Shakesp.
All that pass, hiss and wag their head at thee. La. ii. 15.
Thou canst not wag thy finger, or beginThe least light motion, but it tends to sin. Dryden.
So have I seen in black and white,A prating thing, a magpye hight,Majestically stalk;A stately, worthless animal,That plies the tongue, and wags the tail,All flutter, pride, and talk. Swift.

Wag (verb neuter)
To Wag. v.n.

 To be in quick or ludicrous motion.
Be merry, my wife has all;For women are shrews, both short and tall;'Tis merry in hall, where beards wag all. Shakesp.
I will fight with him upon this theme,Until my eyelids will no longer Wag. Shakesp. Hamlet.
 To go; to be moved.
I will provoke him to't, or let him wag. Shakespeare.
Her charms she mutter'd o'er;And yet the resty sieve wagg'd ne'er the more:I wept for woe. Dryden's Theocritus.

Wage (noun)
Wage. n.s. the plural wages is now only used. [wegen, or wagen, German; gages, Fr.]

 Pay given for service.
            All friends shall tasteThe wages of their virtue, and all foesThe cup of their deservings. Shakesp. K. Lear.
The last petition is for my men; they are the poorest,But poverty could never draw them from me;That they may have their wages duly paid them,And something over to remember me. Shakespeare.
By Tom Thumb, a fairy page;He sent it, and doth him engage,By promise of a mighty wage,It secretly to carry. Drayton's Nymphid.
The thing itself is not only our duty, but our glory: and he who hath done this work, has, in the very work, partly received his wages. South.
 Gage; pledge. Ainsw.

Wage (verb)
To Wage. v.a. [The origination of this word, which is now only used in the phrase to wage war, is not easily discovered: waegen, in German, is to attempt any thing dangerous.]

 To attempt; to venture.
We must not think the Turk is so unskilful,Neglecting an attempt of ease and gain,To wake and wage a danger profitless. Shakespeare.
 To make; to carry on.  Applied to war.
Return to her, and fifty men dismiss'd!No; rather I abjure all roofs, and chuseTo wage against the enmity o' th' air,To be a comrade with the wolf. Shakesp. K. Lear.
Your reputation wages war with the enemies of your royal family, even within their trenches. Dryden.
He ponder'd, which of all his sons was fitTo reign, and wage immortal war with wit. Dryden.
 [From wage, wages.] To set to hire.
            Thou must wageThy works for wealth, and life for gold engage. F. Queen.
 To take to hire; to hire for pay; to hold in pay; to employ for wages.
I seem'd his follower, not partner; andHe wag'd me with his countenance, as ifI had been mercenary. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
The officers of the admiralty having places of so good benefit, it is their parts, being well waged and rewarded, exactly to look into the sound building of ships. Raleigh.
The king had erected his courts of ordinary resort, and was at the charge not only to wage justice and their ministers, but also to appoint the safe custody of records. Bacon.
This great lord came not over with any great number of waged soldiers. Davies's Ireland.
 [In law.]
When an action of debt is brought against one, as for money or chattles, left or lent the defendant, the defendant may wage his law; that is, swear, and certain persons with him, that he owes nothing to the plaintiff in manner as he hath declared.  The offer to make the oath is called wager of law: and when it is accomplished, it is called the making or doing of law. Blount.

Wager (noun)
Wáger. n.s. [from wage, to venture.]

 A bett; any thing pledged upon a chance or performance.
Love and mischief made a wager, which should have most power in me. Sidney.
The sea strove with the winds which should be louder; and the shrouds of the ship, with a ghastful noise to them that were in it, witnessed that their ruin was the wager of the other's contention. Sidney, b. ii.
Full fast she fled, ne ever look'd behind;As if her life upon the wager lay. Fairy Queen.
Besides these plates for horse-races, the wagers may be as the persons please. Temple.
Factious, and fav'ring this or t' other side,Their wagers back their wishes. Dryden.
If any atheist can stake his soul for a wager, against such an inexhaustible disproportion; let him never hereafter accuse others of credulity. Bentley's Sermons.
 [In law.] An offer to make oath.  See to wage in law.
Multiplication of actions upon the case were rare formerly, and there by wager of law ousted, which discouraged many suits. Hale.

Wager (verb)
To Wáger. v.a. [from the noun.] To lay; to pledge as a bett; to pledge upon some casualty or performance.
'Twas merry, when you wager'd on your angling. Shakesp.
He that will lay much to stake upon every flying story, may as well wager his estate which way the wind will sit next morning. Government of the Tongue.
        I feed my father's flock;What can I wager from the common stock? Dryden.

Wages
Wáges. n.s. See Wage.

Waggery
Wággery. n.s. [from wag.] Mischievous merriment; roguish trick; sarcastical gaiety.
'Tis not the waggeries or cheats practised among schoolboys, that make an able man; but the principles of justice, generosity, and sobriety. Locke.

Waggish
Wággish. adj. [from wag.] Knavishly merry; merrily mischievous; frolicksome.
        Change fear and niceness,The handmaids of all women, or, more truly,Woman its pretty self, to waggish courage. Shakespeare.
This new conceit is the waggish suggestion of some sly and sculking atheists. More's Divine Dialogues.
A company of waggish boys watching of frogs at the side of a pond, still as any of them put up their heads, they would be pelting them down with stones.  Children, says one of the frogs, you never consider, that though this may be play to you, 'tis death to us. L'Estrange.
As boys, on holidays let loose to play,Lay waggish traps for girls that pass that way;Then shout to see in dirt and deep distressSome silly cit. Dryden.

Waggishness
Wággishness. n.s. [from waggish.] Merry mischief.
A christian boy in Constantinople had like to have been stoned for gagging, in a waggishness, a long billed fowl. Bacon.

Waggle
To Wággle. v.n. [wagghelen, German.] To waddle; to move from side to side.
The sport Basilius would shew to Zelmane, was the mounting of his hawk at a heron, which getting up on his waggling wings with pain, as though the air next to the earth were not fit for his great body to fly through, was now grown to diminish the sight of himself. Sidney.
Why do you go nodding and waggling so, as if hip-shot? says the goose to her gosseling. L'Estrange.

Wagon
Wágon. n.s. [wœʒen, Sax. waeghens, Dutch; vagn, Islandick.]

 A heavy carriage for burthens.
The Hungarian tents, were enclosed round with waggons, one chained to another. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
Waggons fraught with utensils of war. Milton.
 A chariot. Not in use.
Now fair Phœbus 'gan decline in haste,His weary waggon to the western vale. Spenser.
Then to her waggon she betakes,And with her bears the witch. Spenser.
                O Proserpina,For the flowers now that frighted thou let'st fallFrom Dis's waggon. Shakespeare.
Her waggon spokes made of long spinner's legs;The cover, of the wings of grasshoppers. Shakespeare.

Wagonner
Wágonner. n.s. [from wagon.] One who drives a wagon.
By this, the northern waggoner had setHis sevenfold team behind the stedfast star,That was in ocean waves yet never wet. Fairy Queen, b. i.
Gallop apace, you fi'ry-footed steeds,Tow'rd Phœbus' mansion! such a waggonerAs Phaeton would whip you to the west. Shakespeare.
A waggoner took notice upon the creaking of a wheel, that it was the worst wheel that made most noise. L'Estrange.
The waggoners that curse their standing teams,Wou'd wake e'en drowsy Drufus from his dreams. Dryden.
I described to him the use and the nature of it; and the next day the waggoners arrived with it. Gulliver's Travels.

Wagtail
Wágtail. n.s. A bird. Ainsw.

Waid
Waid. v.a. [I suppose for weighed.] Crushed.
His horse waid in the back, and shoulder shotten. Shakesp.

Waif
Waif. n.s. [wavium, waivium, law Lat. from wave.] Goods found, but claim'd by no body; that of which every one waves the claim.  Commonly written weif. Ainsw.

Wail (noun)
Wail. n.s. Audible sorrow.
            Around the woodsShe sighs her song, which with her wail resound. Thomson.

Wail (verb active)
To Wail. v.a. [gualare, Italian.] To moan; to lament; to bewail.
Wise men ne'er wail their present woes,But presently prevent the ways to wail. Shakespeare.
Say, if my spouse maintains her royal trust?Or if no more her absent lord she wails,But the false woman o'er the wife prevails? Pope.

Wail (verb neuter)
To Wail. v.n. To grieve audibly; to express sorrow.
Son of man wail for the multitude. Ez. xxxii. 18.
I will wail and howl. Mic. i. 8.

Wailful
Wáilful. adj. [from wail and full.] Sorrowful; mournful.
    Lay lime to tangle her desiresBy wailful sonnets, whose composed rhimesShould be full fraught with serviceable vows. Shakespeare.

Wailing
Wáiling. n.s. [from wail.] Lamentation; moan; audible sorrow.
The camp filled with lamentation and mourning, which would be increased by the weeping and wailing of them, which should never see their brethren. Knolles.
Other cries amongst the Irish, favour of the Scythian barbarism; as the lamentations of their burials, with despairful outcries, and immoderate wailings. Spenser's Ireland.
Take up wailing for us, that our eyes may run down with tears. Jer. ix. 18.
The wailings of a maiden I recite. Gay.

Wallop
To Wállop. v.n. [wealan, to boil, Saxon.] To boil.

Wand
Wand. n.s. [vaand, Danish.]

 A small stick, or twig; a long rod.
The skilful shepherd peel'd me certain wands. Shakesp.
With a whip or wand, if you strike the air, the sharper and quicker you strike it, the louder sound it giveth. Bacon.
His spear, to equal which the tallest pineHewn on Norwegian hills, to be the mastOf some great admiral, were but a wand. Milton.
A child runs away laughing, with good smart blows of a wand on his back, who would have cried for an unkind word. Locke on Education.
 Any staff of authority, or use.
Though he had both spurs and wand, they seemed rather marks of sovereignty, than instruments of punishment. Sidney.
He held before his decent steps a silver wand. Milton.
 A charming rod.
Nay, lady, sit; if I but wave this wand,Your nerves are all chain'd up in alabaster. Milton.
Picus bore a buckler in his hand;His other wav'd a long divining wand. Dryden.

Wapentake
Wápentake. n.s. [from wœpun, Saxon, and take, wapentakium, wapentagium, low Latin.]
Wapentake is all one with what we call a hundred: as upon a meeting for that purpose, they touched each other's weapons, in token of their fidelity and allegiance. Cowel.
Hundred signifieth a hundred pledges, which were under the command and assurance of their alderman; which, as I suppose, was also called a wapentake, so named, of touching the weapon or spear of their alderman, and swearing to follow him faithfully, and serve their prince truly. But others think, that a wapentake was ten hundreds, or boroughs. Spenser.

Wardmote
Wárdmote. n.s. [weard and mot, or ʒemot, Saxon; wardemotus, low Lat.] A meeting; a court held in each ward or district in London for the direction of their affairs.

Wardrobe
Wárdrobe. n.s. [garderobe, French; garderoba, low Lat.] A room where cloaths are kept.
The third had of their wardrobe custody,In which were not rich tires nor garments gay,The plumes of pride, and wings of vanity,But cloaths meet to keep keen cold away. Fairy Queen.
            I will kill all his coats,I'll murder all his wardrobe piece by pieceUntil I meet the king. Shakespeare's Henry IV.
                Behold!What from his wardrobe her belov'd allows,To deck the wedding-day of his unspotted spouse. Dryden.
It would not be an impertinent design to make a kind of an old Roman wardrobe, where you should see toga's and tunica's, the chlamys and trabea, and all the different vests and ornaments so often mentioned in the Greek and Roman authors. Addison.

Warlock
Wárlock.Wárluck.

n.s. [vardlookr, Islandick, a charm; werloʒ, Saxon, an evil spirit. This etymology was communicated by Mr. Wise.] A male witch; a wizzard.


Warlock in Scotland is applied to a man whom the vulgar suppose to be conversant with spirits, as a woman who carries on the same commerce is called a witch: he is supposed to have the invulnerable quality which Dryden mentions, who did not understand the word.
He was no warlock, as the Scots commonly call such men, who they say are iron free or lead free. Dryden.

Warluck
Wárlock.Wárluck.

n.s. [vardlookr, Islandick, a charm; werloʒ, Saxon, an evil spirit. This etymology was communicated by Mr. Wise.] A male witch; a wizzard.


Warlock in Scotland is applied to a man whom the vulgar suppose to be conversant with spirits, as a woman who carries on the same commerce is called a witch: he is supposed to have the invulnerable quality which Dryden mentions, who did not understand the word.
He was no warlock, as the Scots commonly call such men, who they say are iron free or lead free. Dryden.

Warm (adjective)
Warm. adj. [warm, Gothick; wearm, Sax. warm, Dutch.]

 Not cold, though not hot; heated to a small degree.
He stretched himself upon the child, and the flesh of the child waxed warm. 2 Kings iv. 34.
Main ocean flow'd, not idle, but with warmProlifick humour, soft'ning all her globe. Milton.
 Zealous; ardent.
I never thought myself so warm in any party's cause as to deserve their money. Pope.
Scaliger in his poetics is very warm against it. Broome's Notes on the Odyssey.
 Violent; furious; vehement.
Welcome day-light; we shall have warm work on't:The Moor will 'gageHis utmost forces on his next assault,To win a queen and kingdom. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
 Busy in action.
I hate the ling'ring summons to attend,Death all at once would be a nobler end;Fate is unkind: methinks a generalShould warm, and at the head of armies fall. Dryden.
 Fanciful; enthusiastick.
If there be a sober and a wise man, what difference will there be between his knowledge and that of the most extravagant fancy in the world? If there be any difference between them, the advantage will be on the warm-headed man's side, as having the more ideas, and the more lively. Locke.

Warm (verb)
To Warm. v.a. [from the adjective.]

 To free from cold; to heat in a gentle degree.
It shall be for a man to burn, for he shall take thereof and warm himself. Isa. xliv. 15.
There shall not be a coal to warm at, nor fire to sit before it. Isa. xlvii. 14.
                The mounted sunShot down direct his fervid rays to warmEarth's inmost womb. Milton.
These soft fires with kindly heatOf various influence, foment and warm. Milton.
 To heat mentally; to make vehement.
The action of Homer being more full of vigour than that of Virgil, is more pleasing to the reader: one warms you by degrees, the other sets you on fire all at once, and never intermits his heat. Dryden.

Wasp
Wasp n.s. [weasp, Saxon; vespa, Latin; guespe, French.] A brisk stinging insect, in form resembling a bee.
More wasps, that buz about his nose,Will make this sting the sooner. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
Encount'ring with a wasp,He in his arms the fly doth clasp. Drayton.
Why, what a wasp-tongu'd and impatientArt thou, to break into this woman's mood,Trying thine ear to no tongue but thine own? Shak. H. IV.

Waspish
Wáspish. adj. [from wasp.] Peevish; malignant; irritable; irascible.
        I'll use you for my laughter,When you are waspish. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
Come, you wasp, you are too angry.— If I be waspish, best beware my sting. Shakespeare.
By the stern brow and waspish action,Which she did use as she was writing of it,It bears an angry tenour. Shak. As you like it.
The taylor's wife was only a good hearty shrew, under the impotency of an unruly waspish humour: she would have her will. L'Estrange.
Upon this gross mistake the poor waspish creature runs on for many leaves. Stillingfleet.
Much do I suffer, much, to keep in peaceThis jealous, waspish, wrong-head, rhiming race. Pope.

Wassail


Water (noun)
Wa'ter. n.s. [waeter, Dutch; ƿœꞇꞃ, Saxon.]

 Sir Isaac Newton defines water, when pure, to be a very fluid salt, volatile, and void of all savour or taste; and it seems to consist of small, smooth, hard, porous, spherical particles, of equal diameters, and of equal specifick gravities, as Dr. Cheyne observes; and also that there are between them spaces so large, and ranged in such a manner, as to be pervious on all sides. Their smoothness accounts for their sliding easily over one another's surfaces: their sphericity keeps them also from  touching one another in more points than one; and by both these their frictions in sliding over one another, is rendered the least possible. Their hardness accounts for the incompressibility of water, when it is free from the intermixture of air. The porosity of water is so very great, that there is at least forty times as much space as matter in it; for water is nineteen times specifically lighter than gold, and consequently rarer in the same proportion. Quincy.
 My mildness hath allay'd their swelling griefs, My mercy dry'd their water-flowing tears. Shak. H. VI.
 Your water is a sore decayer of your whorson dead body. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
         The sweet manner of it forc'd Those waters from me, which I would have stopp'd, But I had not so much of man in me; But all my mother came into mine eyes, And gave me up to tears. Shakes. Henry V.
 Men's evil manners live in brass, their virtues We write in water. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
 Those healths will make thee and thy state look ill, Timon: here's that which is too weak to be a sinner, honest water, which ne'er left man i' th' mire. Shakespeare's Timon.
 Water is the chief ingredient in all the animal fluids and solids; for a dry bone, distilled, affords a great quantity of insipid water: therefore water seems to be proper drink for every animal. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 The sea.
 Travel by land or by water. Common Prayer.
 By water they found the sea, westward from Peru, always very calm. Abbot's Description of the World.
 Urine.
         If thou could'st, doctor, cast The water of my land, find her disease, And purge it to a sound and pristine health, I would applaud thee. Shak. Macbeth.
 Go to bed, after you have made water. Swift.
 To hold Water. To be sound; to be tight. From a vessel that will not leak.
 A good Christian and an honest man must be all of a piece, and inequalities of proceeding will never hold water. L'Estr.
 It is used for the lustre of a diamond.
             'Tis a good form, And rich: here is a water, look ye. Shakesp. Timon.
  Water is much used in composition for things made with water, being in water, or growing in water.
 She might see the same water-spaniel, which before had hunted, come and fetch away one of Philoclea's gloves, whose fine proportion shewed well what a dainty guest was wont there to be lodged. Sidney.
 Oh that I were a mockery king of snow, Standing before the sun of Bolingbroke, And melt myself away in water-drops. Shakespeare.
 Poor Tom eats the wall-newt, and the water-newt. Shakes.
         Touch me with noble anger! O let not women's weapons, water-drops, Stain my man's cheeks. Shak. King Lear.
 Let not the water-flood overflow me. Ps. lxix. 15.
 They shall spring up as among the grass, as willows by the water-courses. Is. xliv. 4.
 As the hart panteth after the water-brook, so panteth my soul after thee, O God. Psalms.
 Deep calleth unto deep, at the noise of thy water-spouts. Ps. xlii. 7.
 He turneth rivers into a wilderness, and the water-springs into dry ground. Ps. cvii. 33.
 There were set six water-pots of stone. Jo. ii. 6.
 Hercules's page, Hylas, went with a water-pot to fill it at a pleasant fountain that was near. Bacon's Natural History.
 As the carp is accounted the water-fox for his cunning, so the roach is accounted the water-sheep. Walton's Angler.
 Sea-calves unwonted to fresh rivers fly; The water-snakes with scales upstanding die. May's Virgil.
 By making the water-wheels larger, the motion will be so slow, that the screw will not be able to supply the outward streams. Wilkins's Dædulus.
 Rain carried away apples, together with a dunghill that lay in the water-course. L'Estrange.
         Oh help, in this extremest need, If water-gods are deities indeed. Dryden.
 The water-snake, whom fish and paddocks fed, With staring scales lies poison'd in his bed. Dryd. Virgil.
 Because the outermost coat of the eye might be pricked, and this humour let out, therefore nature hath made provision to repair it by the help of certain water-pipes, or lymphæducts, inserted into the bulb of the eye, proceeding from glandules that separate this water from the blood. Ray on Creation.
 The lacerta aquatica, or water-newt, when young, hath four neat ramified fins, two on one side, growing out a little above its forelegs, to poise and keep its body upright, which fall off when the legs are grown. Denham's Physico-Theology.
 Other mortar used in making water-courses, cisterns, and fishponds, is very hard and durable. Moxon.
 The most brittle water-carriage was used among the Egyptians, who, as Strabo saith, would sail sometimes in boats made of earthen ware. Arbuthnot.
 A gentleman watered St. foln in dry weather at new sowing, and, when it came up, with a water-cart, carrying his water in a cask, to which there was a tap at the end, which lets the water run into a long trough full of small holes. Mort.
 In Hampshire they fell water-trefoil as dear as hops. Mort.

Watermelon
Wátermelon. n.s. A plant. It hath trailing branches, as the cucumber of melon, and is distinguished from other cucurbitaceous plants, by its leaf deeply cut and jugged, and by its producing uneatable fruit. Miller.

Wave (noun)
Wave. n.s. [wæʒe, Saxon; waegh, Dutch; vague, French.]

 Water raised above the level of the surface; billow; water driven into inequalities.
The shore, that o'er his wave-worn basis bow'd. Shakesp.
The waves that rise would drown the highest hill;But at thy check they flee, and when they hearThy thund'ring voice, they post to do thy will. Wotton.
Amidst these toils succeeds the balmy night;Now hissing waters the quench'd guns restore;And weary waves withdrawing from the sight,Are lull'd, and pant upon the silent shore. Dryden.
The wave behind impels the wave before. Pope.
Luxuriant on the wave-worn bank he layStretch'd forth, and panting in the sunny ray. Pope.
 Unevenness; inequality.
Thus it happens, if the glass of the prisms be free from veins, and their sides be accurately plane and well polished, without those numberless waves, or curls, which usually arise from sand-holes a little smoothed in polishing with putty. Newton.

Wave (verb active)
To Wave. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To raise into inequalities of surface.
            He had a thousand noses,Horns welk'd and wav'd like the enridged sea. Shakespeare.
 To move loosely.
They wav'd their fiery swords, and in the airMade horrid circles. Milton.
He beckoned to me, and, by the waving of his hand, directed me to approach the place where he sat. Addison.
 To waft; to remove any thing floating.
Some men never conceive how the motion of the earth below should wave one from a knock perpendicularly directed from a body in the air above. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 To beckon; to direct by a waft or motion of any thing.
        Look with what courteous actionIt waves you to a more removed ground:But do not go with it. Shakespeare.
 [Guesver, Fr. Skinner.] To put off.
He resolved not to wave his way upon this reason, that if he should but once, by such a diversion, make his enemy believe he were afraid of danger, he should never live without. Wotton's Life of the Duke of Buckingham.
These, waving plots, found out a better way;Some god descended, and preserv'd the play. Dryden.
 To put aside for the present.
I have wav'd the subject of your greatness, to resign myself to the contemplation of what is more peculiarly yours. Dryden.
Since she her interest for the nation's wav'd,Then I who sav'd the king, the nation sav'd. Dryden.

Wave (verb neuter)
To Wave. v.n. [from the noun.]

 To play loosely; to float.
                I may findYour warlike ensigns waving in the wind. Dryden.
                Messapus' helmHe laces on, and wears the waving crest. Dryden.
 To be moved as a signal.
A bloody arm it is, that holds a pineLighted, above the capitol, and nowIt waves unto us. B. Johnson's Catiline.
 To be in an unsettled state; to fluctuate.
They wave in and out, no way sufficiently grounded, no way resolved, what to think, speak, or write, more than only that because they have taken it upon them, they must be opposite. Hooker, b. v.
If he did not care whether he had their love or no, he wav'd indifferently 'twixt doing them neither good nor harm. Shakesp. Coriolanus.

Wawl
To Wawl. v.n. [wa, grief, Saxon.] To cry; to howl.
The first time that we smell the air,We wawle and cry. Shakespeare's K. Lear.

Way
Way. n.s. [wœʒ, Saxon; weigh, Dutch.]

 The road in which one travels.
 I am amaz'd, and lose my way, Among the thorns and dangers of this world. Shakespeare.
         You cannot see your way. — — I have no way, and therefore want no eyes: I stumbled when I saw. Shakesp. K. Lear.
 To God's eternal house direct the way, A broad and ample road. Milton.
 Flutt'ring the god, and weeping said, Pity poor Cupid, generous maid! Who happen'd, being blind, to stray, And on thy bosom lost his way. Prior.
 Broad road made for passengers.
 Know'st thou the way to Dover? — — Both stile and gate, horse-way, and foot-path. Shakesp.
 A length of journey.
 An old man that had travelled a great way under a huge burden, found himself so weary, that he called upon death to deliver him. L'Estrange.
 Course; direction of motion.
 I now go toward him, therefore follow me, And mark what way I make. Shakesp. Winter Tale.
 He stood in the gate, and ask'd of ev'ry one, Which way she took, and whither she was gone. Dryden.
 Attending long in vain, I took the way, Which through a path, but scarcely printed, lay. Dryden.
 With downward force he took his way, And roll'd his yellow billows to the sea. Dryden.
 My seven brave brothers, in one fatal day, To death's dark mansions took the mournful way. Dryden.
 To observe every the least difference that is in things, keeps the understanding steady and right in its way to knowledge. Locke.
 Advance in life.
 The boy was to know his father's circumstances, and that he was to make his way by his own industry. Spectator, № 123.
 Passage; power of progression made or given.
 Back do I toss these treasons to thy head: This sword of mine shall give them instant way, Where they shall rest for ever. Shakesp. K. Lear.
                     Th' angelick choirs, On each hand parting, to his speed give way, On each hand parting, to his speed gave way, Through all th' empyreal road. Milton's Par. Lost, b. v.
 Youth and vain confidence thy life betray: Through armies this has made Melantius' way. Waller.
 The reason may be, that men seldom come into those posts, till after forty; about which time the natural heat beginning to decay, makes way for those distempers. Temple.
 The air could not readily get out of those prisons, but by degrees, as the earth and water above would give way. Burnet.
 As a soldier, foremost in the fight, Makes way for others. Dryden.
 Some make themselves way, and are suggested to the mind by all the ways of sensation and reflection. Locke.
 Vacancy made by timorous or respectful recession.
 There would be left no difference between truth and falsehood, if what we certainly know, give way to what we may possibly be mistaken in. Locke.
 Nor was he satisfy'd, unless he made the pure profession of the gospel give way to superstition and idolatry, wherever he had power to expel the one, and establish the other. Atterbury.
 I would give way to others, who might argue very well upon the same subject. Swift.
 Local tendency.
 Come a little nearer this way, I warrant thee no body hears. Shakesp. Mer. Wives of Wind.
 Course; regular progression.
 But give me leave to seize my destin'd prey, And let eternal justice take the way. Dryden.
 Situation where a thing may probably be found.
 These inquisitions are never without baseness, and very often useless to the curious inquirer. For men stand upon their guards against them, laying all their counsels and secrets out of their way. Taylor's Rule of Living Holy.
 A situation or course obstructive and obviating.
 The imagination being naturally tumultuous, interposeth itself without asking leave, casting thoughts in our way, and forcing the understanding to reflect upon them. Duppa.
 Tendency to any meaning, or act.
 There is nothing in the words that sounds that way, or points particularly at persecution. Atterbury.
 Access; means of admittance.
 Being once at liberty, 'twas said, having made my way with some foreign prince, I would turn pirate. Raleigh.
 Sphere of observation.
 The general officers, and the publick ministers that fell in my way, were generally subject to the gout. Temple.
 Means; mediate instrument; intermediate step.
 By noble ways we conquest will prepare; First offer peace, and that refus'd, make war. Dryden.
 What conceivable ways are there, whereby we should come to be assured that there is such a being as God? Tillotson.
 A child his mother so well instructed this way in geography, that he knew the limits of the four parts of the world. Locke.
 It is not impossible to God to make a creature with more ways to convey into the understanding the notice of corporeal things, than those five he has given to man. Locke.
 Method; scheme of management.
 He durst not take open way against them, and as hard it was to take a secret, they being so continually followed by the best, and every way ablest of that region. Sidney, b. ii.
 Will not my yielded crown redeem my breath? Still am I fear'd? is there no way but death? Daniel.
 As by calling evil good, a man is misrepresented to himself in the way of flattery; so by calling good evil, he is misrepresented to others, in the way of slander. South's Sermons.
 Now what impious ways my wishes took? How they the monarch, and the man forsook? Prior.
 The senate, forced to yield to the tribunes of the people, thought it their wisest course to give way also to the time. Swift.
 Private determination.
 He was of an high mind, and loved his own will and his way, as one that revered himself, and would reign indeed. Bacon.
                 If I had my way, He had mew'd in flames at home, not i' th' senate; I had sing'd his furs by this time. B. Johnson's Catiline.
 Manner; mode.
 She with a calm carelessness let every thing slide, as we do by their speeches, who neither in matter nor person do any way belong unto us. Sidney.
 God hath so many times and ways spoken to men. Hooker.
 Few writers make an extraordinary figure, who have not something in their way of thinking or expressing, that is entirely their own. Spectator, № 160.
 His way of expressing and applying them, not his invention of them, is what we admire. Addison.
 Method; manner of practice.
 Having left the way of nobleness, he strove to climb to the height of terribleness. Sidney.
                 Matter of mirth, She could devise, and thousand ways invent, To feed her foolish humour, and vain jolliment. Spenser.
                     Taught To live th' easiest way, not with perplexing thoughts. Milton.
 Method or plan of life, conduct, or action.
 A physician, unacquainted with your body, may put you in a way for a present cure, but overthroweth your health in some other kind. Bacon.
                     To attain The height and depth of thy eternal ways, All human thought comes short. Milton.
 When a man sees the prodigious expence our forefathers have been at in these barbarous buildings, one cannot but fancy what miracles they would have left us, had they only been instructed in the right way. Addison on Italy.
 Right method to act or know.
 We are quite out of the way, when we think that things contain within themselves the qualities that appear to us in them. Lo.
 They are more in danger to go out of the way, who are marching under the conduct of a guide that will mislead them, than he that has not yet taken a step, and is likelier to enquire after the right way. Locke.
 By me, they offer all that you can ask, And point an easy way to happiness. Rowe.
 General scheme of acting.
 Men who go out of the way to hint free things, must be guilty of absurdity, or rudeness. Clarissa.
 By the way. Without any necessary connection with the main design: en passant.
 Note, by the way, that unity of continuance is easier to procure, than unity of species. Bacon's Nat. Hist.
 Will. Honeycomb, now on the verge of threescore, asked me, in his most serious look, whether I would advise him to marry lady Betty Single, who, by the way, is one of the greatest fortunes about town. Spectator, № 475.
 To go or come one's way, or ways; to come along, or depart. A familiar phrase.
             Nay, come your ways; This is his majesty, say your mind to him. Shakespeare.
 To a boy fast asleep upon the brink of a river, fortune came and wak'd him; prithee get up, and go thy ways, thou'lt tumble in and be drown'd else. L'Estrange.
 Way and ways, are often used corruptly for wise.
 But if he shall any ways make them void after he hath heard them, then he shall bear her iniquity. Numb. xxx. 15.
 They erect conclusions no way inferible from their premises. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 Being sent to reduce Paros, he mistook a great fire at a distance for the fleet, and being no ways a match for them, set sail for Athens. Swift.
 'Tis no way the interest even of priesthood. Pope.

Weal (1)
Weal. n.s. [welan, Saxon; wealust, Dutch.]

 Happiness; prosperity; flourishing state.
                Our weal on you depending,Counts it your weal, that he have liberty. Shakespeare.
As we love the weal of our souls and bodies, let us so behave ourselves as we may be at peace with God. Bacon.
                Thine, and of all thy sons,The weal or woe in thee is plac'd; beware! Milton.
Ireland ought to be considered, not only in its own interest, but likewise in relation to England, upon whose weal in the main, that of this kingdom depends. Temple.
 Republick, state, publick interest.
            Blood hath been shedEre human statute purg'd the gen'ral weal. Shakespeare.
How shall the muse, from such a monarch stealAn hour, and not defraud the publick weal. Pope.

Weal (2)
Weal. n.s. [walan, Saxon.] The mark of a stripe.
Like warts or weals it hangs upon her skin. Donne.

Weapon
Wea'pon. n.s. [ƿapon, Saxon.] Instrument of offence; something with which one is armed to hurt another.
                         The giant Down let fall his arm, and soft withdrew His weaponhuge, that heaved was on high, For to have slain the man that on the ground did ly. Fa. Q.
The cry of Talbot serves me for a sword; For I have loaden me with many spoils, Using no other weapon but his name. Shakesp. Henry VI.
                     Take this weapon Which I have here recover'd from the Moor. Shakesp. Othello.
             Touch me with noble anger; O let not womens weapons, water drops, Stain my man's cheeks. Shakespeare's King Lear.
His foes, who came to bring him death, Bring him a weapon that before had none. Daniel.
With his full force he whirl'd it first around, Imperial Juno turn'd the course before; And fix'd the wand'ring weapon in the door. Dryden's Æn.

Weasel
Weásel. n.s. [wesel, Saxon; wesel, Dutch; mustela, Latin.] A small animal that eats corn and kills mice.
Ready in gybes, quick-answer'd, saucy andAnd quarrelsome as the weasel. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
A weasel once made shift to slinkIn at a corn loft through a chink. Pope.

Webster
Wébster. n.s. [webstre, Saxon; a woman-weaver.] A weaver. Obsolete.
After local names, the most in number have been derived from occupations; as Taylor, Webster, Wheeler. Camden.

Weigh (verb active)
To Weigh. v.a. [wœʒan, Saxon; weyhen, Dutch.]

 To examine by the balance.
Earth taken from land adjoining to the Nile, and preserved, so as not to be wet nor wasted, and weighed daily, will not alter weight until the seventeenth of June, when the river beginneth to rise; and then it will grow more and more ponderous, 'till the river cometh to its height. Bacon's Natural History.
Th' Eternal hung forth his golden scales,Wherein all things created first he weigh'd. Milton.
 To be equivalent to in weight.
By the exsuction of the air out of a glass-vessel, it made that vessel take up, or suck up, to speak in the common language, a body weighing divers ounces. Boyle.
 To pay, allot, or take by weight.
They that must weigh out my afflictions,They that my trust must grow to, live not here;They are, as all my comforts are, far hence. Shakespeare.
They weighed for my price thirty pieces of silver. Zech. xi.
 To raise; to take up the anchor.
Barbarossa, using this exceeding cheerfulness of his soldiers, weighed up the fourteen gallies he had sunk. Knolles.
    Here he left me, ling'ring here delay'dHis parting kiss, and there his anchor weigh'd. Dryden.
 To examine; to balance in the mind.
Regard not who it is which speaketh, but weigh only what is spoken. Hooker.
I have in equal balance justly weigh'dWhat wrongs our arms may do, what wrongs we suffer,And find our griefs heavier than our offences. Shak. H. IV.
The ripeness or unripeness of the occasion must ever be well weighed. Bacon.
His majesty's speedy march left that design to be better weighed and digested. Clarendon.
You chose a retreat, and not 'till you had maturely weighed the advantages of rising higher, with the hazards of the fall. Dryden.
All grant him prudent; prudence interest weighs,And interest bids him seek your love and praise. Dryden.
The mind, having the power to suspend the satisfaction of any of its desires, is at liberty to examine them on all sides, and weigh them with others. Locke.
He is the only proper judge of our perfections, who weighs the goodness of our actions by the sincerity of our intentions. Addison's Spectator.
 To Weigh down. To overballance.
Fear weighs down faith with shame. Daniel's Civ. War.
 To Weigh down. To overburden; to oppress with weight; to depress.
The Indian fig boweth so low, as it taketh root again; the plenty of the sap, and the softness of the stalk, making the bough, being overloaden, weigh down. Bacon.
        In thy blood will reignA melancholy damp of cold and dry,To weigh thy spirits down. Milton.
            Her father's crimesSit heavy on her, and weigh down her prayers;A crown usurp'd, a lawful king depos'd,His children murder'd. Dryden's Spanish Fryar.
My soul is quite weigh'd down with care, and asksThe soft refreshment of a moment's sleep. Addison's Cato.
Excellent persons, weighed down by this habitual sorrow of heart, rather deserve our compassion than reproach. Addison.

Weigh (verb neuter)
To Weigh. v.n.

 To have weight.
Exactly weighing and strangling a chicken in the scales, upon an immediate ponderation, we could discover no difference in weight; but suffering it to lie eight or ten hours until it grew perfectly cold, it weighed most sensibly lighter. Brown.
 To be considered as important; to have weight in the intellectual ballance.
This objection ought to weigh with those, whose reading is designed for much talk and little knowledge. Locke.
A wise man is then best satisfied, when he finds that the same argument which weighs with him has weighed with thousands before him, and is such as hath born down all opposition. Addis.
 To raise the anchor.
When gath'ring clouds o'ershadow all the skies,And shoot quick lightnings, weigh, my boys, he cries. Dryden.
 To bear heavily; to press hard.
Can'st thou not minister to a mind diseas'd,And with some sweet oblivious antidoteCleanse the stuff'd bosom of that perilous stuffWhich weighs upon the heart? Shakesp. Macbeth.

Weighed
Weighed. adj. [from weigh.] Experienced.
In an embassy of weight, choice was made of some sad person of known experience, and not of a young man, not weighed in state matters. Bacon.

Welcome (adjective)
Wélcome. adj. [bien venu, French; wilcume, Saxon; welkom, Dutch.]

 Received with gladness; admitted willingly to any place or enjoyment; grateful; pleasing.
        I serve you, madam:Your graces are right welcome. Shakesp. King Lear.
He, though not of the plot, will like it,And wish it should proceed; for, unto menPrest with their wants, all change is ever welcome. B. Johns.
Here let me earn my bread,'Till oft invocated deathHasten the welcome end of all my pains. Milton.
He that knows how to make those he converses with easy, has found the true art of living, and being welcome and valued every where. Locke.
 To bid Welcome. To receive with professions of kindness.
Some stood in a row in so civil a fashion, as if to welcome us; and divers put their arms a little abroad, which is their gesture when they bid any welcome. Bacon.

Welfare
Wélfare. n.s. [well and fare.] Happiness; success; prosperity.
If friends to a government forbear their assistance, they put it in the power of a few desperate men to ruin the welfare of those who are superiour to them in strength and interest. Add.
Discretion is the perfection of reason: cunning is a kind of instinct that only looks out after our immediate interest and welfare. Addison's Spectator.

Well (adjective)
Well. adj. [Well seems to be sometimes an adjective, though it is not always easy to determine its relations.]

 Not sick; not unhappy.
        Mark, we use To say the dead are well. Shakes. Ant. and Cleopatra.
 Lady, I am not well, else I should answer From a full flowing stomach. Shakesp. King Lear.
 In poison there is physick; and this news, That would, had I been well, have made me sick, Being sick, hath in some measure made me well. Shakesp.
 While thou art well, thou mayest do much good; but when thou art sick, thou can'st not tell what thou shalt be able to do: it is not very much nor very good.  Few men mend with sickness, as there are but few who by travel and a wandering life become devout. Taylor's Guide to Devotion.
 Men under irregular appetites never think themselves well, so long as they fancy they might be better; then from better they must rise to best. L' Estrange.
'Tis easy for any, when well, to give advice to them that are not. Wake's Preparation for Death.
 Convenient; happy.
 Holdings were so plentiful, and holders so scarce, as well was the landlord, who could get one to be his tenant. Carew.
 Charity is made the constant companion and perfection of all virtues; and well it is for that virtue where it most enters, and longest stays. Sprat's Sermons.
 This exactness is necessary, and it would be well too, if it extended itself to common conversation. Locke.
 It would have been well for Genoa, if she had followed the example of Venice, in not permitting her nobles to make any purchase of lands in the dominions of a foreign prince. Ad.
 Being in favour.
 He followed the fortunes of that family; and was well with Henry the fourth. Dryden.
 Recovered from any sickness or misfortune.
                 I am sorry For your displeasure; but all will sure be well. Shakespeare.
 Just thoughts, and modest expectations are easily satisfied.  If we don't over-rate our pretensions, all will be well. Collier.

Well (adverb)
Well. adv. [will, Gothick; well, Saxon; wel, Dutch; vel, Islandick.

 Not ill; not unhappily.
 Some sense, and more estate, kind heav'n To this well-lotted peer has given: What then? he must have rule and sway; Else all is wrong till he's in play. Prior.
 Not ill; not wickedly.
 My bargains, and well-won thrift he calls int'rest. Shak.
 Thou one bad act with many deeds well done May'st cover. Milton.
 Skilfully; properly.
 A private caution I know not well how to sort, unless I should call it political, by no means to build too near a great neighbour. Wotton.
 Beware and govern well thy appetite. Milton.
 Whether the learn'd Minerva be her theme, Or chaste Diana bathing in the stream; None can record their heavenly praise so well. Dryden.
 What poet would not mourn to see His brother write as well as he? Swift.
 Not amiss; not unsuccessfully; not erroneously.
 Solyman commended them for a plot so well by them laid, more than he did the victory of others got by good fortune, not grounded upon any good reason. Knolles.
 The soldier that philosopher well blam'd, Who long and loudly in the schools declaim'd. Denham.
 'Tis almost impossible to translate verbally and well. Dryden.
 Not insufficiently; not defectively.
 The plain of Jordan was well watered everywhere. Genesis.
 We are well able to overcome it. Num. xiii. 30.
 The merchant adventurers being a strong company, and well underset with rich men, held out bravely. Bacon.
 To a degree that gives pleasure.
 I like well, in some places, fair columns upon frames of carpenters work. Bacon.
 With praise; favourably.
 All the world speaks well of you. Pope.
 Well is sometimes like the French bien, a term of concession.
 The knot might well be cut, but untied it could not be. Sidney.
                To know In measure what the mind can well contain. Milton.
 It is a word by which something is admitted as the ground for a conclusion.
 Well, let's away, and say how much is done. Shakespeare.
 Well, by this author's confession, a number superior are for the succession in the house of Hanover. Swift.
 As well as. Together with; not less than.
 Coptos was the magazine of all the trade from Æthiopia, by the Nile, as well as of those commodities that came from the west by Alexandria. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 Well is him or me; bene est, he is happy.
 Well is him that dwelleth with a wife of understanding, and that hath not slipped with his tongue. Ecclus. xxv. 8.
 Well nigh. Nearly; almost.
 I freed well nigh half th' angelick name. Milton.
 It is used much in composition, to express any thing right, laudable, or not defective.
 Antiochus understanding him not be well affected to his affairs, provided for his own safety. 2 Mac. iv. 21.
 There may be safety to the well·affected Persians; but to those which do conspire against us, a memorial of destruction. Esth. xvi. 23.
 Should a whole host at once discharge the bow, My well-aim'd shaft with death prevents the foe. Pope.
 What well-appointed leader fronts us here? Shakesp.
 Well-apparel'd April on the heel Of limping winter treads. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
 The pow'r of wisdom march'd before, And ere the sacrificing throng he join'd, Admonish'd thus his well-attending mind. Pope.
            Such musick Before was never made, But when of old the sons of morning sung, Whilst the Creator great His constellations set, And the well-balanc'd world on hinges hung. Milton.
 Learners must at first be believers, and their master's rules having been once made axioms to them, they mislead those who think it sufficient to excuse them, if they go out of their way in a well-beaten track. Locke.
 He chose a thousand horse, the flow'r of all His warlike troops, to wait the funeral: To bear him back, and share Evander's grief; A well-becoming, but a weak relief. Dryden.
            Those opposed files, Which lately met in the intestine shock, And furious close of civil butchery, Shall now, in mutual well-beseeming rank, March all one way. Shakesp. Hen. IV.
O'er the Elean plains, thy well-breath'd horse Impels the flying car, and wins the course. Dryden.
 More dismal than the loud disploded roar Of brazen enginry, that ceaseless storms The bastion of a well-built city. Philips.
 He conducted his course among the same well-chosen friendships and alliances with which he began it. Addison.
My son corrupts a well-derived nature With his inducement. Shakespeare.
 If good accrue, 'tis conferr'd most commonly on the base and infamous; and only happening sometimes to well-deservers. Dryden.
 It grieves me he should desperately adventure the loss of his well-deserving life. Sidney, b. ii.
 What a pleasure is well-directed study in the search of truth! Locke.
 A certain spark of honour, which rose in her well-disposed mind, made her fear to be alone with him, with whom alone she desired to be. Sidney, b. ii.
 The unprepossessed, the well-disposed, who both together make much the major part of the world, are affected with a due fear of these things. South's Sermons.
 A clear idea is that, whereof the mind hath such a full and evident perception, as it does receive from an outward object, operating duly on a well-disposed organ. Locke.
 Amid the main, two mighty fleets engage; Actium surveys the well-disputed prize. Dryden.
 The ways of well-doing are in number even as many, as are the kinds of voluntary actions: so that whatsoever we do in this world, and may do it ill, we shew ourselves therein by well-doing to be wise. Hooker, b. ii.
 The conscience of well-doing may pass for a recompence. L'Estrange.
 God will judge every man according to his works; to them, who by patient continuance in well-doing, endure through the heat and burden of the day, he will give the reward of their labour. Rogers's Sermons.
         As far the spear I throw, As flies an arrow from the well-drawn bow. Pope.
 Fair nymphs and well-dress'd youths around her shone, But ev'ry eye was fixt on her alone. Pope.
 Such a doctrine in St. James's air, Shou'd chance to make the well-drest rabble stare. Pope.
 The desire of esteem, riches, or power, makes men espouse the well-endowed opinions in fashion. Locke.
 We ought to stand firm in well-established principles, and not be tempted to change for every difficulty. Watts.
 Echenus sage, a venerable man! Whose well-taught mind the present age surpass'd. Pope.
 Some reliques of the true antiquity, though disguised, a well-eyed man may happily discover. Spenser on Ireland.
 How sweet the products of a peaceful reign? The heaven-taught poet, and enchanting strain: The well-fill'd palace, the perpetual feast; A land rejoicing, and a people blest. Pope.
 Turkish blood did his young hands imbrue. From thence returning with deserv'd applause, Against the Moors his well-flesh'd sword he draws. Dryden.
 Fairest piece of well-form'd earth, Urge not thus your haughty birth. Waller.
 A rational soul can be no more discerned in a well-formed, than ill-shaped infant. Locke.
 A well-formed proposition is sufficient to communicate the
knowledge of a subject. Watts.
 Oh! that I'd dy'd before the well-fought wall! Had some distinguish'd day renown'd my fall, AIl Greece had paid my solemn funerals. Pope.
 Good men have a well-grounded hope in another life; and are as certain of a future recompence, as of the being of God. Atterbury.
 Let firm, well-hammer'd soles protect thy feet Through freezing snows. Gay's Trivia.
 The camp of the heathen was strong, and well-harnessed, and compassed round with horsemen. 1 Mic. iv. 7.
 Among the Romans, those who saved the life of a citizen, were dressed in an oaken garland; but among us, this has been a mark of such well-intentioned persons as would betray their country. Addison.
        He, full of fraudful arts, This well-invented tale for truth imparts. Dryden.
 He, by enquiry, got to the well-known house of Kalander. Sidney.
 Soon as thy letters trembling I unclose, That well-known name awakens all my woes. Pope.
 Where proud Athens rears her tow'ry head, With opening streets, and shining structures spread, She past, delighted, with the well-known seats. Pope.
 From a confin'd well-manag'd store, You both employ and feed the poor. Waller.
 A noble soul is better pleas'd with a zealous vindicator of liberty, than with a temporizing poet, or well-manner'd court-slave, and one who is ever decent, because he is naturally servile. Dryden's Dedication to Juvenal.
 Well-meaners think no harm; but for the rest, Things sacred they pervert, and silence is the best. Dryden.
 By craft they may prevail on the weakness of some well-meaning men to engage in their designs. Rogers's Sermons.
 He examines that well-meant, but unfortunate, lie of the conquest of France. Arbuthnot.
 A critick supposes he has done his part, if he proves a writer to have faiI'd in an expression; and can it be wonder'd at, if the poets seern resolved not to own themselves in any error? for as long as one side despises a well-meant endeavour, the other will not be satisfied with a moderate approbation. Pope's Preface to his Works.
 Many sober, well-minded men, who were real lovers of the peace of the kingdom, were imposed upon. Clarendon.
 Jarring int'rests of themselves create Th'according musick of a well-mix'd state. Pope.
 When the blast of winter blows, Into the naked wood he goes; And seeks the tusky boar to rear, With well-mouth'd hounds, and pointed spear. Dryden.
 The applause that other people's reason gives to virtuous and well-ordered actions, is the proper guide of children, till they grow able to judge for themselves. Locke.
 The fruits of unity, next unto the well-pleasing of God, which is all in all, are towards those that are without the church; the other toward those that are within. Bacon.
 The exercise of the offices of charity is always well-pleasing to God, and honourable among men. Atterbury.
 My voice shall sound, as you do prompt mine ear; And I will stoop, and humble my intents To your well-practis'd wise directions. Shakesp. Hen. VI.
 The well-proportion'd shape, and beauteous face, Shall never more be seen by mortal eyes. Dryden.
 'Twas not the hasty product of a day, But the well-ripen'd fruit of wise delay. Dryden.
 Procure those that are fresh gathered, strait, smooth, and well-rooted. Mortimer's Husbandry.
 If I should instruct them to make well-running verses, they want genius to give them strength. Dryden.
 The eating of a well-seasoned dish, suited to a man's palate, may move the mind, by the delight itself that accompanies the eating, without reference to any other end. Locke.
 Instead of well-set hair, baldness. Isa. iii. 24.
 Abraham and Sarah were old, and well-stricken in age. Genesis.
 Many well-shaped innocent virgins are waddling like big-bellied women. Spectator, № 127.
 We never see beautiful and well-tasted fruits from a tree choaked with thorns and briars. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 The well-tim'd oars With sounding strokes divide the sparkling waves. Smith.
 Wisdom's triumph is well-tim'd retreat, As hard a science to the fair as great. Pope.
 Mean time we thank you for your well-took labour. Go to your rest. Shakesp. Hamlet.
 Oh you are well-tun'd now; but I'll let down the pegs that make this musick. Shakesp. Othello.
 Her well-turn'd neck he view'd, And on her shoulders her dishevel'd hair. Dryden.
 A well-weighed judicious poem, which at first gains no more upon the world than to be just received, insinuates itself by insensible degrees into the liking of the reader. Dryden.
                He rails On me, my bargains, and my well-won thrift, Which he calls interest. Shakesp. Merch. of Venice.
 Each by turns the other's bound invade, As, in some well-wrought picture, light and shade. Pope.

Well (noun)
Well. n.s. [welle, wœll, Saxon.]

 A spring; a fountain; a source.
 Begin then, sisters of the sacred well, That from beneath the seat of Jove doth spring. Milton.
 As the root and branch are but one tree, And well and stream do but one river make; So if the root and well corrupted be, The stream and branch the same corruption take. Davies.
 A deep narrow pit of water.
 The muscles are so many well-buckets: when one of them acts and draws, 'tis necessary that the other must obey. Dryden.
 The cavity in which stairs are placed.
 Hollow newelled stairs are made about a square hollow newel: suppose the well-hole to be eleven foot long, and six foot wide, and we would bring up a pair of stairs from the first floor eleven foot high, it being intended a sky-light shall fall through the hollow newel. Moxon's Mech. Exer.

Well (verb active)
To Well. v.a. To pour any thing forth.
 To her people wealth they forth do well, And health to every foreign nation. Fairy Queen.

Well (verb neuter)
To Well. v.n. [weaIIan, Saxon.] To spring; to issue as from a spring .
Thereby a crystal stream did gently play, Which from a sacred fountain welled forth alway. Fa. Qu.
The bubbling wave did ever freshly well. Fairy Queen.
        A dreary corse, All wallow'd in his own yet lukewarm blood, That from his wound yet welled fresh, alas! Spenser.
Himself assists to lift him from the ground, With clotted locks, and blood that well'd from out the wound. Dryden's Æn.
        From his two springs, Pure welling out, he through the lucid lake Of fair Dambea rolls his infant stream. Thomson's Summer.

Wench
Wench. n.s. [wencle, Saxon.]

 A young woman.
What do I, silly wench, know what love hath prepared for me? Sidney, b. ii.
Now – how dost thou look now? Oh ill-starr'd wench!Pale as thy smock! when we shall meet at compt,This look of thine will hurl my soul from heav'n,And fiends will snatch at it.  Cold, cold, my girl,Ev'n like thy chastity. Shakesp. Othello.
Thou wouldst perswade her to a worse offenceThan that, whereof thou didst accuse her wench. Donne.
 A young woman in contempt; a strumpet.
But the rude wench her answer'd nought at all. Spenser.
Do not play in wench-like words with thatWhich is so serious. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
Men have these ambitious fancies,And wanton wenches read romances. Prior.
 A strumpet.
It is not a digression to talk of bawds in a discourse upon wenches. Spectator, № 266.

Where
Where. adv. [hwœr, Saxon; waer, Dutch.]

 At which place or places.
 She visited that place, where first she was so happy as to see the cause of her unhap. Sidney.
 God doth in publick prayer respect the solemnity of places, where his name should be called on amongst his people. Hooker.
 In every land we have a larger space, Where we with green adorn our fairy bow'rs. Dryden.
     In Lydia born, Where plenteous harvests the fat fields adorn. Dryden.
 At what place.
 Ah! where was Eloise? Pope.
 At the place in which.
 Where I thought the remnant of mine ageShould have been cherish'd by her child-like duty, I now am full resolv'd to take a wife. Shakespeare.
 Any Where. At any place.
Those subterraneous waters were universal, as a dissolution of the exterior earth could not be made anywhere but it would fall into waters. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
 Where, like here, has in composition a kind of pronominal signification: as, whereof, of which.

 It has the nature of a noun.  Not now in use.
 He shall find no where safe to hid himself. Spenser.
 Bid them farewel, Cordelia, though unkind: Thou losest here, a better where to find. Shakesp. K. Lear.

Whig
Whig. n.s. [þwœʒ, Saxon.]

 Whey.

 The name of a faction.
The southwest counties of Scotland have seldom corn enough to serve them round the year; and the northern parts producing more than they need, those in the west come in the Summer to buy at Leith the stores that come from the north; and from a word, whiggam, used in driving their horses, all that drove were called whiggamors, and shorter the whiggs.  Now in that year before the news came down of duke Hamilton's defeat, the ministers animated their people to rise and march to Edinburgh; and they came up marching on the head of their parishes with an unheard-of fury, praying and preaching all the way as they came. The marquis of Argyle and his party came and headed them, they being about six thousand. This was called the whiggamor's inroad; and ever after that, all that opposed the court came in contempt to be called whigs: and from Scotland the word was brought into England, where it is now one of our unhappy terms of disunion. Burnet.
 Whoever has a true value for church and state, should avoid the extremes of whig for the sake of the former, and the extremes of tory on the account of the latter. Swift.

While (adverb)
While.Whiles.Whilst.

adv. [Hwile, Saxon. Whiles is now out of use.]



 During the time that.
        Whiles I was protector,Pity was all the fault that was in me. Shakes. Henry VI.
What we have, we prize not to the worth,Whiles we enjoy it; but being lackt and lost,Why, then we rack the value. Shakespeare.
Repeated, while the sedentary earthAttains her end. Milton.
 As long as.
Use your memory, and you will sensibly experience a gradual improvement, while you take care not to over-load it. Watt's Logick.
 At the same time that.
Whiles by the experiment of this ministration they glorify God, for your professed subjection unto the Gospel. 2 Cor. ix.
Can he imagine that God sends forth an irresistible strength against some sins, whilst in others he permits men a power of repelling his grace? Decay of Piety.

While (noun)
While n.s. [weil, German; þwile, Saxon.] Time; space of time.
If my beauty be any thing, then let it obtain this much of you, that you will remain some while in this company, to ease your own travel and solitariness. Sidney.
I have seen her rise from her bed, and again return to bed; yet all this while in a most fast sleep. Shakesp. Macbeth.
One while we thought him innocent,And then w' accus'd the consul. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
I hope all ingenuous persons will advertise me fairly, if they think it worth their while, of what they dislike in it. Digby.
Pausing a while, thus to herself she mus'd. Milton.
How couldst thou look for other, but that God should condemn thee for the doing of those things for which thine own conscience did condemn thee, all the while thou wast doing of them? Tillotson.
That which I have all this while been endeavouring to convince men to, is no other but what God himself doth particularly recommend. Tillotson.
Few, without the hope of another life, would think it worth their while to live above the allurements of sense. Atterb.
What fate has disposed of the papers, 'tis not worth while to tell. Locke.

While (verb)
To While. v.n. [from the noun.] To loiter.
Men guilty this way never have observed that the whiling time, the gathering together, and waiting a little before dinner, is the most aukwardly passed away of any. Spectator.

Whiles
While.Whiles.Whilst.

adv. [Hwile, Saxon. Whiles is now out of use.]



 During the time that.
        Whiles I was protector,Pity was all the fault that was in me. Shakes. Henry VI.
What we have, we prize not to the worth,Whiles we enjoy it; but being lackt and lost,Why, then we rack the value. Shakespeare.
Repeated, while the sedentary earthAttains her end. Milton.
 As long as.
Use your memory, and you will sensibly experience a gradual improvement, while you take care not to over-load it. Watt's Logick.
 At the same time that.
Whiles by the experiment of this ministration they glorify God, for your professed subjection unto the Gospel. 2 Cor. ix.
Can he imagine that God sends forth an irresistible strength against some sins, whilst in others he permits men a power of repelling his grace? Decay of Piety.

Whilst
While.Whiles.Whilst.

adv. [Hwile, Saxon. Whiles is now out of use.]



 During the time that.
        Whiles I was protector,Pity was all the fault that was in me. Shakes. Henry VI.
What we have, we prize not to the worth,Whiles we enjoy it; but being lackt and lost,Why, then we rack the value. Shakespeare.
Repeated, while the sedentary earthAttains her end. Milton.
 As long as.
Use your memory, and you will sensibly experience a gradual improvement, while you take care not to over-load it. Watt's Logick.
 At the same time that.
Whiles by the experiment of this ministration they glorify God, for your professed subjection unto the Gospel. 2 Cor. ix.
Can he imagine that God sends forth an irresistible strength against some sins, whilst in others he permits men a power of repelling his grace? Decay of Piety.

Whimsey
Whi'msey. n.s. [Only another form of the word whim.] A freak; a caprice; an odd fancy; a whim.
 At this rate a pretended freak or whimsey may be palliated. L'Estrange.
 All the ridiculous and extravagant shapes that can be imagined, all the fancies and whimsies of poets and painters, and Egyptian idolaters, if so be they are consistent with life and propagation, would be now actually in being, if our atheists notion were true. Ray on the Creation.
 So now, as health or temper changes, In larger compass Alma ranges; This day below, the next above, As light or solid whimseys move. Prior.
 Oranges in whimsey-boards went round. King.
 Less should I dawb it o'er with transitory praise, And water-colours of these days; These days! where e'en th' extravagance of poetry Is at a loss for figures to express Men's folly, whimsies, and inconstancy. Swift.

Who
Who. pronoun. [hwa, Saxon; wie, Dutch.]

 A pronoun relative, applied to persons.
We have no perfect description of it, nor any knowledge how, or by whom it is inhabited. Abbot.
Oft have I seen a timely-parted ghost,Of ashy semblance, meagre, pale, and bloodless,Being all descended to the lab'ring heart,Who, in the conflict that it hold with death,Attracts the same for aidance 'gainst the enemy. Shakesp.
Were the grac'd person of our Banquo present,Whom I may rather challenge for unkindness,Than pity for mischance. Shakesp. Macbeth.
            The son of Duncan,From whom this tyrant holds the due of birth,Lives in the English court. Shakesp. Macbeth.
A man can never be obliged to submit to any power, unless he can be satisfied, who is the person who has a right to exercise it. Locke.
Tell who loves who; what favours some partake,And who is jilted. Dryden.
We are still as much at a loss, who civil power belongs to. Locke.
 As who should say, elliptically for as one who should say.
Hope throws a generous contempt upon ill usage, and looks like a handsome defiance of a misfortune: a who should say, you are somewhat troublesome now, but I shall conquer you. Collier against Despair.
 Whose is the genitive of which, as well as of who, and is applied to things.
Whose soever sins ye remit, they are remitted; and whose soever sins ye retain, they are retained. John xx. 23.
The question whose solution I require,Is what the sex of women most desire. Dryden.
Is there any other doctrine, whose followers are punished? Add.
 It has sometimes a disjunctive sense.
There thou tell'st of kings, and who aspire;Who fall, who rise, who triumphs, who do moan. Daniel.

Wildservice
Wildse'rvice. n.s. [eratægus, Lat.]  A plant.
The leaves are single; the flower consists of five leaves, which expand in form of a rose.  The fruit is small, and shaped like a pear, in which are many hard seeds. Miller.

Will (verb)
To Will. v.a. [wilgan, Gothick; willan, Saxon; willen, Dutch.]

 To desire that any thing should be, or be done.
 To will, is to bend our souls to the having or doing of that which they see to be good. Hooker.
 Let Richard be restored to his blood, As will the rest; so willeth Winchester. Shakespeare.
 I speak not of God's determining his own will, but his predetermining the acts of our will.  There is as great difference betwixt these two, as betwixt my willing a lawful thing myself, and my inducing another man to do that which is unlawful. Hammond on Fundamentals.
 Whosoever wills the doing of a thing, if the doing of it be in his power, he will certainly do it; and whosoever does not do that thing, which he has in his power to do, does not properly will it. South.
 A man that sits still, is said to be at liberty, because he can walk if he wills it. Locke.
 To be inclined or resolved to have.
             She's too rough for me; There, there, Hortensio, will you any wife? Shakesp.
 To command; to direct.
 St. Paul did will them of Corinth, every man to lay up somewhat on the Sunday, and to reserve it in store for the church of Jerusalem, for the relief of the poor there. Hooker.
 How rarely does it meet with this time's guise, When man was willed to love his enemies. Shakesp.
 Our battle is more full of names than yours, Our men more perfect in the use of arms, Our armours all as strong, our cause the best; Then reason wills our hearts should be as good. Shakesp.
 He willed him to be of good comfort, promising to bestow upon him whatsoever he should win. Knolles.
 If they had any business, his Majesty willed that they should attend. Clarendon.
             'Tis your's, O queen! to will The work, which duty binds me to fulfil. Dryden.
 It has a loose and slight signification.
 Let the circumstances of life be what, or where they will, a man should never neglect improvement. Watts.
 It is one of the signs of the future tense; of which it is difficult to show or limit the signification.
I will come. I am determined to come; importing choice.
Thou wilt come. It must be so that thou must come; importing necessity.
 Wilt thou come? Hast thou determined to come? importing choice.
He will come. He is resolved to come; or it must be that he must come, importing either choice or necessity.
 It will come. It must so be that it must come; importing necessity.
 The plural follows the analogy of the singular.

Wink (noun)
Wink. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Act of closing the eye.
                You doing thus,To the perpetual wink for ay might putThis ancient moral. Shakespeare's Tempest.
Since I receiv'd command to do this business,I have not slept one wink. Shakes. Cymbeline.
The beams so reverend and strong,Do'st thou not thinkI could eclipse and cloud them with a wink,But that I would not lose her sight so long? Donne.
It raged so all night, that I could not sleep a wink. Temple.
        Not write! but then I think;And for my soul I cannot sleep a wink. Pope.
 A hint given by motion of the eye.
Her wink each bold attempt forbids. Sidney.
The stockjobber thus from 'Change-alley goes down,And tips you the freeman a wink;Let me have but your vote to serve for the town,And here is a guinea to drink. Swift.

Wink (verb)
To Wink. v.n. [winctan, Saxon; wincken, Dutch.]

 To shut the eyes.
Let's see thine eyes; wink now, now open them:In my opinion, yet, thou see'st not well. Shak. Hen. VI.
They're fairies; he that speaks to them shall die:I'll wink and couch; no man their sports must eye. Shak.
            His false cunningTaught him to face me out of his acquaintance,And grew a twenty years removed thing,While one would wink. Shakes. Twelfth Night.
        He with great imagination,Proper to madmen, led his pow'rs to death,And, winking, leap'd into destruction. Shakes. H. IV.
In despite of all this, he runs foolishly into his sin and ruin, merely because he winks hard, and rushes violently like a horse into the battle. Taylor.
The Scripture represents wicked men as without understanding; not that they are destitute of the natural faculty: they are not blind, but they wink. Tillotson.
If any about them should make them think there is any difference between being in the dark and winking, get it out of their minds. Locke.
 To hint, or direct by the motion of the eyelids.
You saw my master wink and laugh upon you. Shakesp.
Send him a spoon when he wants a knife: wink at the footman to leave him without a plate. Swift.
 To close and exclude the light.
While Hermes pip'd and sung, and told his tale,The keeper's winking eyes began to fail,And drowsy slumber on the lids to creep,'Till all the watchman was at length asleep. Dryden.
        When you shoot, and shut one eye,You cannot think he would denyTo lend the t'other friendly aid,Or wink, as coward, and afraid. Prior.
 To connive; to seem not to see; to tolerate.
They be better content with one that will wink at their faults, than with him that will reprove them. Whitgifte.
I, for winking at your discords too,Have lost a brace of kinsmen. Shak. Romeo and Juliet.
Let not night see my black and deep desires;The eye wink at the hand! Shakesp. Macbeth.
The king gave him great gifts, and winked at the great spoil of Bosworth-field, which came almost wholly to this man's hands. Bacon's Henry VII.
Let us not write at a loose rambling rate,In hope the world will wink at all our faults. Roscommon.


Some faults of course with childhood end;We therefore wink at wags, when they offend,And spare the boy, in hopes the man may mend.

  Dryden.


Obstinacy cannot be winked at, but must be subdued. Locke.
Cato is stern, and awful as a god:He knows not how to wink at human frailty,Or pardon weakness that he never felt. Addison's Cato.
 To be dim.
The sullen tyrant slept not all the night,But, lonely walking by a winking light,Sobb'd, wept and groan'd, and beat his wither'd breast. Dry.

Witless
Wi'tless. adj. [from wit.] Wanting understanding.
 Why then should witless man so much misween That nothing is but that which he hath seen? Fairy Queen.
 I have ever lov'd the life remov'd; And held in idle price to haunt assemblies, Where youth, and cost, and witless brav'ry keeps. Shakesp.
                     So't pleas'd my destiny, Guilty of my sin of going, to think me As vain, as witless, and as false as they Which dwell in court. Donne.
 He kept us slaves, by which we fitly prove That witless pity breedeth fruitless love. Fairfax.
                   The apple's outward form Delectable, the witless swain beguiles, 'Till with a writhen mouth and spattering noise He tastes the bitter morsel and rejects. Philips.

Witness (noun)
Wíness. n.s. [witnesse, Saxon.]

 Testimony; attestation.
The devil can cite scripture for his purpose;An evil soul producing holy witness,Is like a villain with a smiling cheek;A goodly apple rotten at its heart. Shakespeare.
May we, with the warrant of womanhood, and the witness of a good conscience, pursue him any further revenge? Shak.
If I bear witness of myself, my witness is not true. John.
The spirit beareth witness with our spirit that we are the children of God. Rom. viii. 16.
Many bare false witness, but their witness agreed not. Mar.
Nor was long his witness unconfirmed. Milton.
Ye moon and stars bear witness to the truth!His only crime, if friendship can offend,Is too much love to his unhappy friend. Dryden's Æneid.
Our senses bear witness to the truth of each others report, concerning the existence of sensible things. Locke.
 One who gives testimony.
            The king's attorneyUrg'd on examinations, proofs, confessionsOf divers witnesses. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
God is witness betwixt me and thee. Gen. xxxi. 50.
              Thy trial chooseWith me, best witness of thy virtue try'd. Milton.
A fat benefice became a crime, and witness too against its incumbent. Decay of Piety.
Nor need I speak my deeds, for these you see;The sun and day are witness for me. Dryden.
 With a Witness. Effectually; to a great degree, so as to leave some lasting mark or testimony behind. A low phrase.
Here was a blessing handed out with the first pairs of animals at their creation; and it had effect with a witness. Wood.
Now gall is bitter with a witness;And love is all delight and sweetness. Prior.

Woman (noun)
Wóman. [wifman, wimman, Saxon; whence we yet pronounce women in the plural, wimmen, Skinner.]

 The female of the human race.
That man who hath a tongue is no man,If with his tongue he cannot win a woman. Shakespeare.
Thou dotard, thou art woman-tir'd, unroostedBy thy dame Parlet here. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
Women are soft, mild, pitiful and flexible;Thou stern, obdurate, flinty, rough, remorseless. Shakesp.
And Abimelech took men-servants and women servants. Gen.
O woman, lovely woman, nature form'd theeTo temper man: we had been brutes without thee. Otway.
Ceneus a woman once and once a man;But ending in the sex she first began. Dryden's Æn.
Women are made as they themselves would choose,Too proud to ask, too humble to refuse. Garth.
Women in their nature are much more gay and joyous than men; whether it be that their blood is more refined, their fibres more delicate, and their animal spirits more light; vivacity is the gift of women, gravity that of men. Addison.
 A female attendant on a person of rank.
I could not personally deliver to herWhat you commanded me; but by her womanI sent your message. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.

Work (noun)
Work. n.s. [weorc, Saxon; werk, Dutch.]

 Toil; labour; employment.
Bread, correction, and work for a servant. Ecclus. xxxiii.
In the bottom of some mines in Germany there grow vegetables, which the work-folks say have magical virtue. Bac.
The ground, unbid, gives more than we can ask;But work is pleasure, when we chuse our task. Dryden.
 A state of labour.
All the world is perpetually at work, only that our poor mortal lives should pass the happier for that little time we possess them, or else end the better when we lose them: upon this occasion riches came to be coveted, honours esteemed, friendship pursued, and virtues admired. Temple.
 Bungling attempt.
It is pleasant to see what work our adversaries make with this innocent canon: sometimes 'tis a mere forgery of hereticks, and sometimes the bishops that met there were not so wise as they should have been. Stillingfleet.
 Flowers or embroidery of the needle.
Round her work she did empale,With a fair border wrought of sundry flowers,Inwoven with an ivy-winding trail. Spenser.
That handkerchief, you gave me: I must take out the work: a likely piece of work, that you should find it in your chamber, and know not who left it there.  This is some minx's token, and I must take out the work? There, give it your hobbyhorse: wheresoever you had it, I'll take out no work on't. Shakesp. Othello.
 Any fabrick or compages of art.
Nor was the work impair'd by storms alone,But felt th' approaches of too warm a sun. Pope.
 Action; feat; deed.
The instrumentalness of riches to works of charity, have rendered it necessary in every Christian commonwealth by laws to secure propriety. Hammond.
As to the composition or dissolution of mixt bodies, which is the chief work of elements, and requires an intire application of the agents, water hath the principality and excess over earth. Digby.
Nothing lovelier can be found in woman,Than good works in her husband to promote. Milton.
While as the works of bloody Mars employ'd,The wanton youth inglorious peace enjoy'd. Pope.
 Any thing made.
Where is that holy fire, which verse is saidTo have? Is that enchanting force decay'd?Verse, that draws nature's works from nature's law,Thee, her best work, to her work cannot draw. Donne.
O fairest of creation! last and bestOf all God's works! creature, in whom excelsWhatever can to fight or thought be form'd;Holy, divine, good, amiable, or sweet,How art thou lost! Milton's Paradise Lost.
 Management; treatment.
Let him alone; I'll go another way to work with him. Shak.
 To set on Work To employ; to engage.
It setteth those wits on work in better things, which would be else employed in worse. Hooker.

Work (verb active)
To Work. v.a.

 To make by degrees.
Sidelong he works his way. Milton.
Through winds, and waves, and storms he works his way,Impatient for the battle: one day moreWill set the victor thundering at our gates. Addison.
 To labour; to manufacture.
He could have told them of two or three gold mines, and a silver mine, and given the reason why they forbare to work them at that time, and when they left off from working them. Raleigh's Apology.
The chaos, by the Divine Power, was wrought from one form into another, 'till it settled into an habitable earth. Burn.
This mint is to work off part of the metals found in the neighbouring mountains. Addison.
The young men acknowledged in love-letters, sealed with a particular wax, with certain enchanting words wrought upon the seals, that they died for her. Tatler.
They now begin to work the wond'rous frame,To shape the parts, and raise the vital flame. Blackmore.
The industry of the people works up all their native commodities to the last degree of manufacture. Swift.
 To bring by action into any state.
So the pure limpid stream, when foul with stainsOf rushing torrents and descending rains,Works itself clear, and, as it runs, refines,'Till by degrees the floating mirrour shines. Addison's Cato.
 To influence by successive impulses.
If you would work any man, know his nature and fashions, and so lead him. Bacon.
To hasten his destruction, come yourself,And work your royal father to his ruin. A. Philips.
 To produce; to effect.
        Fly the dreadful war,That in thyself thy lesser parts do move,Outrageous anger, and woe-working jar. Fairy Queen.
Love worketh no ill to his neighbour. Rom. xiii. 10.
Our light affliction for a moment worketh for us a far more eternal weight of glory. 2 Cor. iv. 18.
We might work any effect, not holpen by the co-operation of spirits, but only by the unity of nature. Bacon.
Moisture, although it doth not pass through bodies without communication of some substance, as heat and cold do, yet it worketh effects by qualifying of the heat and cold. Bacon.
Such power, being above all that the understanding of man can conceive, may well work such wonders. Drummond.
God, only wise, to punish pride of wit,Among mens wits hath this confusion wrought;As the proud tow'r, whose points the clouds did hit,By tongues confusion was to ruin brought. Davies.
        Of the tree,Which, tasted, works knowledge of good and evil,Thou may'st not: in the day thou eat'st, thou dy'st. Milton.
 To manage.
Mere personal valour could not supply want of knowledge in building and working ships. Arbuthnot.
 To put to labour; to exert.
Now, Marcus, thy virtue's on the proof;Put forth thy utmost strengh, work every nerve,And call up all thy father in thy soul. Addison's Cato.
 To embroider with a needle.

 To Work out. To effect by toil.
Not only every society, but every single person has enough to do to work out his own salvation. Decay of Piety.
The mind takes the hint from the poet, and works out the rest by the strength of her own faculties. Addison.
 To Work out. To eraze; to efface.
Tears of joy for your returning spilt,Work out and expiate our former guilt. Dryden.
 To Work up. To raise.
That which is wanting to work up the pity to a greater height, was not afforded me by the story. Dryden.
This lake resembles a sea, when worked up by storms. Addis.
The sun, that rolls his chariot o'er their heads,Works up more fire and colour in their cheeks. Addis. Cato.
We should inure ourselves to such thoughts, 'till they have worked up our souls into filial awe and love of him. Atterbury.

Work (verb neuter)
To Work. v.n. pret. worked, or wrought. [weorcan, Saxon; werken, Dutch.]

 To labour; to travail; to toil.
    Good Kent, how shall I live and workTo match thy goodness? life will be too short. Shakesp.
Go and work; for no straw shall be given you. Ex. v. 18.
Whether we work or play, or sleep or wake,Our life doth pass, and with time's wings doth fly. Davies.
 To be in action; to be in motion.
Glory grows guilty of detested crimes,When for fame's sakeWe bend to that the working of the heart. Shakespeare.
    In Morat your hopes a crown design'd,And all the woman work'd within your mind. Dryden.
 To act; to carry on operations.
May be the Lord will work for us. 1 Sa. xiv. 6.
        Our better part remainsTo work in close design. Milton.
 To act as a manufacturer.
They that work in fine flax. Is. xix. 9.
 To ferment.
Into wine and strong beer put some like substances, while they work, which may make them fume and inflame less. Bac.
Try the force of imagination upon staying the working of beer, when the barm is put in. Bacon.
If in the wort of beer, while it worketh before it be tunned, the burrage be often changed with fresh, it will make a sovereign drink for melancholy. Bacon's Natural History.
 To operate; to have effect.
    With some other business put the kingFrom these sad thoughts that work too much upon him. Shak.
All things work together for good to them that love God. Rom. viii. 28.
Gravity worketh weakly, both far from the earth, and also within the earth. Bacon.
Although the same tribute laid by consent, or by imposing, be all one to the purse, yet it works diversely on the courage: no people overcharged with tribute is fit for empire. Bacon.
These positive undertakings wrought upon many to think that this opportunity should not be lost. Clarendon.
Nor number, nor example with him wroughtTo swerve from truth, or change his constant mind. Milton.
We see the workings of gratitude in the Israelites. South.
Objects of pity, when the cause is new,Would work too fiercely on the giddy crowd. Dryden.
Poison will work against the stars: beware,For ev'ry meal an antidote prepare. Dryd. jun. Juvenal.
When this reverence begins to work in him, next consider his temper of mind. Locke.
This so wrought upon the child, that afterwards he desired to be taught. Locke.
Humours and manners work more in the meaner sort than with the nobility. Addison on Italy.
The ibibaboca is a foot round, and three yards and a half long: his colours are white, black, and red: of all serpents his bite is the most pernicious, yet worketh the slowest. Grew.
 To obtain by diligence.
Without the king's assentYou wrought to be a legate. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
He hath wrought with God this day. 1 Sa. xiv. 45.
 To act internally; to operate as a purge, or other physick.
            Work on,My medicine, work! thus credulous fools are caught. Shak.
I should have doubted the operations of antimony, where such a potion could not work. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
It is benign, nor far from the nature of aliment, into which, upon defect of working, it is oft times converted. Brown.
Most purges heat a little; and all of them work best, that is, cause the blood so to do, as do fermenting liquors, in warm weather, or in a warm room. Grew's Cosmol.
 To act as on an object.
Let it be pain of body, or distress of mind, there's matter yet left for philosophy and constancy to work upon. L'Estr.
Natural philosophy has sensible objects to work upon; but then it often puzzles the reader with the intricacy of its notions. Addison.
The predictions Bickerstaff published, relating to his death, too much affected and worked on his imagination. Swift.
 To make way.
Body shall up to spirit work. Milton.
Who would trust chance, since all men have the seedsOf good and ill, which should work upward first? Dryden.
 To be tossed or agitated.
    Vex'd by wint'ry storms, Benacus raves,Confus'd with working sands and rolling waves. Addison.

World
World. n.s. [ƿoꞃlꝺ, Saxon; wereld, Dutch.]

 World is the great collective idea of all bodies whatever. Loc.

 System of beings.
Begotten before all worlds. Nicone Creed.
God hath in these last days spoken unto us by his son, by whom he made the worlds. Hebr. i. 2.
        Know how this worldOf heav'n and earth conspicuous first began. Milton.
 The earth; the terraqueous globe.
                He the worldBuilt on circumfluous waters. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 Present state of existence.
I'm in this earthly world, where to do harmIs often laudable; to do good sometimeAccounted dangerous folly. Shakesp. Macbeth.
I was not come into the world then. L'Estrange.
He wittingly brought evil into the world. More.
Christian fortitude consists in suffering for the love of God, whatever hardships can befal in the world. Dryden.
 A secular life.
Happy is she that from the world retires,And carries with her what the world admires.Thrice happy she, whose young thoughts fixt above,While she is lovely, does to heav'n make love;I need not urge your promise, ere you findAn entrance here, to leave the world behind? Waller.
By the world, we sometimes understand the things of this world; the variety of pleasures and interests which steal away our affections from God.  Sometimes we are to understand the men of the world, with whose solicitations we are so apt to comply. Roger's Sermons.
 Publick life.
Hence banished, is banish'd from the world;And world exil'd is death. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
 Business of life; trouble of life.
Here I'll set up my everlasting rest,And shake the yoke of man's suspicious starsFrom this world-wearied flesh. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
 Great multitude.
You a world of curses undergo,Being the agents, or base second means. Shakespeare.
Nor doth this wood lack worlds of company;For you in my respect are all the world. Shakespeare.
I leave to speak of a world of other attempts furnished by kings. Raleigh's Apology.
What a world of contradictions would follow upon the contrary opinion, and what a world of confusions upon the contrary practice. Bp. Sanderson.
Just so romances are, for what elseIs in them all, but love and battles?O' th' first of these we have no great matterTo treat of, but a world o' th' latter. Hudibras.
It brought into this world a world of woe. Milton.
There were a world of paintings, and among the rest the picture of a lion. L'Estrange.
Marriage draws a world of business on our hands, subjects us to law-suits, and loads us with domestick cares. Dryden.
From thy corporeal poison freed,Soon hast thou reach'd the goal with mended pace;A world of woes dispatched in little space. Dryden.
Why will you fight against so sweet a passion,And steel your heart to such a world of charms? Addison.
 Mankind; an hyperbolical expression for many.
This hath bred high terms of separation between such and the rest of the world, whereby the one sort are named the brethren, the godly; the other worldlings, time-servers, pleasers of men more than of God. Hooker.
            'Tis the duke's pleasure,Whose disposition, all the world well knows,Will not be rubb'd nor stopp'd. Shakesp. K. Lear.
Why dost thou shew me thus to th' world?Bear me to prison. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
He was willing to declare to all the world, that, as he had been brought up in that religion established in the church of England, so he could maintain the same by unanswerable reasons. Clarendon.
 Course of life.
Persons of conscience will be afraid to begin the world unjustly. Clarissa.
 Universal empire.
Rome was to sway the world. Milton.
This through the east just vengeance hurl'd,And lost poor Antony the world. Prior.
 The manners of men.
Children should not know any wickedness. Old folks have discretion, and know the world. Shakespeare.
What start at this! when sixty years have spreadTheir grey experience o'er thy hoary head?Is this the all observing age could gain?Or hast thou known the world so long in vain? Dryden.
If knowledge of the world makes man persidious,May Juba ever live in ignorance. Addison's Cato.
The girl might pass, if we could get herTo know the world a little better;To know the world! a modern phraseFor visits, ombre, balls and plays. Swift.
 A collection of wonders; a wonder. Obsolete.
The bassa having recommended Barbarussa, it was a world to see, how the court was changed upon him. Knolles.
 Time. A sense originally Saxon; now only used in World without end.

 In the world. In Possibility.
All the precautions in the world were taken for the marriage of his younger brother. Addison.
 For all the world. Exactly. A ludicrous sense; now little used.
He had a pair of horns like a bull, his feet cloven, as many eyes upon his body as my grey mare hath dapples, and for all the world so placed. Sidney, b. ii.

Wort
Wort. n.s. [ƿıꞃꞇ, Saxon; wort, Dutch.]

 Originally a general name for an herb; whence it still continues in many, as liverwort, spleenwort.

 A plant of the cabbage kind.

 [hẏꞃꞇ, Saxon.] New beer either unfermented, or in the act of fermentation.
If in the wort of beer, while it worketh, before it be tunned, the burrage be often changed with fresh, it will make a sovereign drink for melancholy. Bacon's Natural History.

Writhe (verb active)
To Writhe. v.a. [ƿꞃıðan, Saxon.]

 To distort; to deform with distortion.
It cannot be this weak and writhed shrimpShould strike such terror in his enemies. Shakes. Henry VI.
Hatefulest disrelish writh'd their jawsWith soot and cinders. Milton.
Her mouth she writh'd, her forehead taught to frown,Her eyes to sparkle fires to love unknown:Her fallow cheeks her envious mind did shew,And ev'ry feature spoke aloud the curstness of a shrew. Dry.
 To twist with violence.
      Then Satan first knew pain,And writh'd him to and fro convolv'd. Milton's Parad. Lost.
Amid' the plaited scales it took its course,And in the spinal marrow spent its force;The monster hiss'd aloud, and rag'd in vain,And writh'd his body to and fro with pain;He bit the dart. Addison.
 To wrest; to force by violence.
The reason which he yieldeth, sheweth the least part of his meaning to be that whereunto his words are writhed. Hook.
 To twist.
            The king of heav'nBar'd his red arm, and launching from the skyHis writhen bolt, not shaking empty smoke,Down to the deep abyss the flaming felon strook. Dryden.

Wry (adjective)
Wry. adj. [from writhe.]

 Crooked; deviating from the right direction,
Sometimes to her news of myself to tellI go about, but then is all my bestWry words, and stamm'ring, or else doltish dumb;Say then, can this but of enchantment come? Sidney.
Cutting the wry neck is never to be practised, but when the disorder is a contraction of the mastoideus muscle. Sharp.
 Distorted.
It is but a kick with thy heels, and a wry mouth, and Sir Roger will be with thee. Arbuthnot.
Instructive work! whose wry-mouth'd portraitureDisplay'd the fates her confessors endure. Pope.
 Wrung; perverted; wrested.
He mangles and puts a wry sense upon protestant writers. Att.
